District of Columbia statutes.
7-1131.16

Transfers to Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services.

Effective October 1, 2006, the Department shall transfer to DYRS all full-time equivalent positions and funding, real and personal property leased or assigned to the Department, assets, records, ongoing obligations, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available relating to the Department’s powers, duties, functions and administration of the operations of the mental health units at the Oak Hill Youth Center and the Youth Services Center.

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 115a
as added Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 5022(c), 53 DCR 6899

History

2001 Ed., § 7-1131.15a.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (90 day) enactments, see §§ 5022(c), 5023 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) enactments, see §§ 5022(c), 5023 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) enactments, see §§ 5022(c), 5023 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).

Emergency Legislation

Section 5023 of D.C. Law 16-192 provided: “The transfer of funding and authority authorized in section 115a of the Department of Mental Health Establishment Amendment Act of 2001, passed on 2nd reading on July 11, 2006 (Enrolled version of Bill 16-679), does not require the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services to employ any persons employed by the Department of Mental Health who are providing mental health or related services to youth in the care and custody of the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services, and the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services shall not inherit, recognize, or be bound by any collective bargaining agreement involving those persons and negotiated and entered into by Department of Mental Health.”

Editor's Notes